Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-5,217
Rules and regulations; State Fire Marshal; equivalency or variance authorized; appeal.

(1) The State Fire Marshal shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations which establish the regulations for conveyances under the Conveyance Safety Act. The rules and regulations may include the Safety Code for Elevators and Escalators, American Society of Mechanical Engineers A17.1 except those parts exempted under section 81-5,216; the standards for conveyors and related equipment, American Society of Mechanical Engineers B20.1; and the Automated People Mover Standards, American Society of Civil Engineers 21. The State Fire Marshal shall annually review to determine if the most current form of such standards should be adopted.

(2) The State Fire Marshal may grant an equivalency or variance request to the rules and regulations adopted in subsection (1) of this section in individual situations upon good cause shown if the safety of those riding or using the conveyance is not compromised by the equivalency or variance. The decision of the State Fire Marshal in granting or refusing to grant an equivalency or variance request may be appealed. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 9;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-2509;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 53;

Laws 2025, LB415, § 22.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.